Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3513.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENTS; INDEPENDENT REDISTRICTING COMMISSION Section 1. new text begin CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENTS PROPOSED.new text end new text begin An amendment to the Minnesota Constitution is proposed to the people. If the amendment is adopted, article IV, section 3, will read: new text end Sec. 3. deleted text begin At its first session after each enumeration of the inhabitants of this state made by the authority of the United States, the legislature shall have the power to prescribe the bounds of congressional and legislative districts.deleted text end Senators shall be chosen by single districts deleted text begin of convenient contiguous territorydeleted text end . No representative district shall be divided in the formation of a senate district. The senate districts shall be numbered in a regular series.new text begin A senate district must consist of two whole representative districts, labeled "A" and "B," respectively.new text end new text begin article IV, section 5, will read: new text end Sec. 5. No senator or representative shall hold any other office under the authority of the United States or the state of Minnesota, except that of postmaster or of notary public. If elected or appointed to another office, a legislator may resign from the legislature by tendering his resignation to the governor. new text begin No senator or representative may be employed as a lobbyist, or otherwise receive compensation for services as a lobbyist, while seated in the legislature and for a period of one year following the end of the senator's or representative's legislative service. "Lobbyist" shall be defined by law. new text end new text begin article IV, section 6, will read: new text end Sec. 6. Senators and representatives shall be qualified voters of the state, and shall have resided one year in the state and six months immediately preceding the election in the district from which elected. Each house shall be the judge of the election returns and eligibility of its own membersnew text begin , but in entering its judgment may not refuse membership or remove a member except upon a majority vote of all members elected to that housenew text end . The legislature shall prescribe by law the manner for taking evidence in cases of contested seats in either house. new text begin article IV, section 12, will read: new text end Sec. 12. The legislature shall meet at the seat of government in regular session in each biennium at the times prescribed by law deleted text begin for not exceeding a total of 120 legislative days. The legislature shall not meet in regular session, nor in any adjournment thereof, after the first Monday following the third Saturday in May of any yeardeleted text end . After meeting at a time prescribed by law, the legislature may adjourn to another time. "Legislative day" shall be defined by law. A special session of the legislature may be called by the governor on extraordinary occasions. Neither house during a session of the legislature shall adjourn for more than three days (Sundays excepted) nor to any other place than that in which the two houses shall be assembled deleted text begin without the consent of the other housedeleted text end new text begin except upon notice by message to the other housenew text end . new text begin a section shall be added to article IV, to read: new text end new text begin Sec. 27. new text end new text begin If a house is equally divided on a question, the lieutenant governor may cast a vote on the question in the senate, and the secretary of state may cast a vote on the question in the house of representatives. These votes must be entered in the journal and counted as if they were cast by a member elected to that house. The lieutenant governor and secretary of state are not members of either house for any other purpose. new text end new text begin article V, section 3, will read: new text end Sec. 3. The governor shall communicate by message to each session of the legislature information touching the state and country. He is commander-in-chief of the military and naval forces and may call them out to execute the laws, suppress insurrection and repel invasion. He may require the opinion in writing of the principal officer in each of the executive departments upon any subject relating to his duties. With the advice and consent of the senate he may appoint notaries public and other officers provided by lawnew text begin , provided that the consent of the senate is not required if the senate has not acted upon an appointment within 60 legislative days of its submission, if submitted more than 90 calendar days prior to adjournment sine die of a regular session of the legislature, or within 60 legislative days after the next legislature is convened, if submitted fewer than 90 calendar days prior to adjournment sine die of a regular session of the legislaturenew text end . He may appoint commissioners to take the acknowledgment of deeds or other instruments in writing to be used in the state. He shall take care that the laws be faithfully executed. He shall fill any vacancy that may occur in the offices of secretary of state, auditor, attorney general and the other state and district offices hereafter created by law until the end of the term for which the person who had vacated the office was elected or the first Monday in January following the next general election, whichever is sooner, and until a successor is chosen and qualified. new text begin article XV shall be added to read: new text end new text begin ARTICLE XV new text end new text begin INDEPENDENT REDISTRICTING COMMISSION new text end new text begin Section 1. new text end new text begin By December 31, 2031, and each year following a federal decennial census thereafter, an Independent Redistricting Commission shall adopt boundaries of congressional and legislative districts. The commission is established within the legislative department and consists of the following members: new text end new text begin (1) five members who support the first political party; new text end new text begin (2) five members who support the second political party; and new text end new text begin (3) five members who do not affiliate with either the first political party or the second political party. new text end new text begin For purposes of this constitution and any subsequent enabling law, the "first political party" means the political party receiving the highest number of combined votes for state constitutional offices and United States Senate during the period since a statewide legislative district plan was last ordered or adopted, aggregated across all elections conducted during that period; and the "second political party" means the political party receiving the second-highest number of combined votes for state constitutional offices and United States Senate during the period since a statewide legislative district plan was last ordered or adopted, aggregated across all elections conducted during that period. new text end new text begin Sec. 2. new text end new text begin A commission member must be a resident of Minnesota, have continuously resided in Minnesota during the current year and the immediately preceding six years, and be eligible to vote in Minnesota. new text end new text begin The following individuals are ineligible to serve on the Independent Redistricting Commission, on the Redistricting Commission Applicant Screening Panel, or as administrative, professional, or technical staff or consultants to either the commission or screening panel: new text end new text begin (1) current federal, state, or local elected officials, and their immediate family members; new text end new text begin (2) current appointed officials who are defined by law as public officials, and their immediate family members; new text end new text begin (3) individuals who have served in any federal, state, or local elected office or appointed position defined by law as a public official in Minnesota during the current year and immediately preceding six years, and their immediate family members; new text end new text begin (4) individuals who have been a candidate for any federal, state, or local elective office in Minnesota during the current year and the immediately preceding six years, and their immediate family members; new text end new text begin (5) individuals who have served as an officer, paid consultant, or contractor to any political party, political action committee, or campaign committee at the federal, state, or local level for any period during the current year or the immediately preceding six years, and their immediate family members; new text end new text begin (6) individuals who have served as a staff member, paid consultant, or contractor for any elected official or candidate for any federal, state, or local office for any period during the current year and the immediately preceding six years, and their immediate family members; and new text end new text begin (7) individuals who have been a lobbyist registered with the state of Minnesota or the federal government for any period during the current year and the immediately preceding six years, and their immediate family members. new text end new text begin Sec. 3. new text end new text begin No later than January 1 of the year of a decennial census, the chief justice of the supreme court must appoint two retired judges who served a federal, state, or Tribal court of jurisdiction in Minnesota to a Redistricting Commission Applicant Screening Panel. One of these appointees must support the first political party, and one of these appointees must support the second political party. The two appointees of the chief justice must mutually agree on one additional retired federal, state, or Tribal court judge who is not affiliated with either the first political party or the second political party, to serve as the third member of the panel and as its chair. Each member of the panel must commit to conduct the work of the panel in a fair and impartial manner, and must not attempt to create an advantage in the applicant screening process for any political party. The purpose of the Redistricting Commission Applicant Screening Panel is to solicit applications from members of the public for service on the Independent Redistricting Commission; to review applications to determine each applicant's qualifications, conflicts of interest, party affiliation, relevant experiences and skills, community ties, and commitment to impartiality, compromise, and fairness; and to establish pools of well-qualified candidates to be used in selecting commission members by random lot. new text end new text begin No later than July 1 of the year of a decennial census, the screening panel must close the application period and select, by majority vote of the panel, a pool of 30 qualified applicants to serve in the role of a commission member supporting the first political party; a pool of 30 qualified applicants to serve in the role of a commission member supporting the second political party; and a pool of 30 qualified applicants to serve in the role of a commission member who does not affiliate with either the first political party or the second political party. To the extent practicable, the screening panel must ensure that each applicant pool consists of well-qualified applicants and reflects the gender, socioeconomic, age, racial, language, ethnic, and geographic diversity of the state. Each congressional district must be represented by at least two applicants in each applicant pool. The panel must make public the name, the current place of residence, and the partisan affiliation, if any, of each person selected for an applicant pool. The panel must make this information available on its website and provide a portal for the submission of public comments on each applicant. Submitted comments may only be viewed by the panel's members. The panel must itself, or by contract with a professional search firm, conduct and publicly broadcast individual screening interviews with the applicants identified in each pool. The purpose of the screening interview must be to examine the applicant's qualifications, conflicts of interest, party affiliation, relevant experiences and skills, community ties, and commitment to impartiality, compromise, and fairness. new text end new text begin After reviewing the public comments and conducting interviews, but no later than September 15 of the year of a decennial census, the screening panel must select and publish a list of finalists who are well qualified and collectively reflect a geographically and demographically representative cross section of the state. The list of finalists must include 15 applicants who support the first political party, 15 applicants who support the second political party, and 15 applicants who do not affiliate with either the first or second political party. new text end new text begin No later than October 15 of the year of a decennial census, the chair of the screening panel must choose, by random lot in a public meeting, three applicants from the pool of 15 finalists supporting the first political party, three applicants from the pool of 15 finalists supporting the second political party, and three applicants from the pool of 15 finalists that do not affiliate with either the first political party or the second political party. The chosen applicants shall be seated as members of the Independent Redistricting Commission. The chair of the screening panel must convene the first meeting of the commission no later than 30 days after the members chosen by random lot have been selected. No later than 60 days following its first meeting, the seated Independent Redistricting Commission members must convene and assess the demographic and geographic diversity of the nine members and must review and select, by majority vote, a total of six additional members, two members from each of the pools of applicants selected by the Redistricting Commission Applicant Screening Panel to be seated. The six additional members shall be chosen to ensure the commission reflects this state's diversity, including but not limited to racial, ethnic, geographic, and gender diversity. It is not intended that formulas or specific ratios be applied for this purpose. At least one member of the commission supporting the first party and one member for the commission supporting the second party must vote in favor of each member seated from the pool of applicants that do not affiliate with either the first political party or the second political party. In the event of an impasse, the chair of the Redistricting Commission Applicant Screening Panel must choose any remaining members by lot from among the applicable pool of applicants established by the panel. The Independent Redistricting Commission may not conduct further business until all commission members have been chosen and seated. new text end new text begin A member of the commission may be removed, for cause, by a vote of 12 members, including the affirmative vote of at least one member supporting the first political party, one member supporting the second political party, and one member that is not affiliated with either the first or second political party. Standards for removal and the ethical conduct of commission members may be further provided by law. The chief justice of the supreme court must fill a vacancy on the commission by random lot from among the pool of applicants selected by the screening panel that corresponds to the party affiliation of the vacating member. The selection process must be open for public viewing. new text end new text begin A commission member may not be seated as a member of the house of representatives or the senate during any year in which a district map adopted by the commission on which the member served is in effect. new text end new text begin Sec. 4. new text end new text begin The commission must elect a chair, vice-chair, and other officers from among its members. A quorum of the commission is nine members. new text end new text begin The commission must adopt a schedule of public hearings and other hearing and administrative procedures to guide the conduct of its work. The schedule and procedures must be designed in favor of transparency and to maximize opportunities for public participation and public comment on the commission's work. The commission must solicit public comment on the locations to be used for public hearings before a schedule is adopted. new text end new text begin The commission must solicit public comment on its map drawing process, its methods of applying the required principles, and the maps proposed by commission members. The commission must also provide opportunities for members of the public to submit proposed maps and proposed methods of applying the required principles and allow opportunities in a public meeting for other members of the public to review and comment on those proposed maps and methods of applying the required principles. new text end new text begin Consistent with available technology, the commission must provide opportunities for the public to view and participate in commission meetings by electronic means, and to access the work of the commission in multiple languages. new text end new text begin A redistricting plan must not be adopted unless the commission has conducted at least two public hearings in each congressional district at which an opportunity for public comment is provided, including one public hearing before any map is drawn and one public hearing after a proposed map is made public. To be adopted, a redistricting plan must be approved in a public meeting by at least nine members, including at least two who support the first political party, two who support the second political party, and one who does not affiliate with either the first or second political parties. A vote on a final redistricting plan may not occur unless the final plan has been publicly posted for at least 14 days. At a meeting where a redistricting plan is proposed for final adoption, the commission may only amend the plan for the purpose of making technical corrections. The meaning of a technical correction, and procedures for adopting technical corrections after the commission has expired, may be provided by law. new text end new text begin The commission must adopt a final redistricting plan no later than December 31 of the year following a decennial census. Each adopted plan, along with a report summarizing the commission's work on the plan, how the plan responds to public input received by the commission, and how the plan adheres to the requirements of this constitution and other applicable law, must be filed with the secretary of state no later than seven days following its adoption. new text end new text begin The commission must hire necessary administrative, professional, and technical staff to assist the commission in its work. Any staff employed by the commission must report to the commission and owe a duty of care and duty of loyalty to the commission as a whole. Staff must be screened for potential biases or conflicts of interest and must demonstrate the necessary experience, expertise, and skills in the conduct of redistricting. new text end new text begin A redistricting plan adopted by the commission is effective beginning at the state general election held the second year following the federal decennial census and thereafter, until new district plans are adopted. The commission expires when both legislative and congressional redistricting plans have been adopted and filed with the secretary of state, but may be reconstituted as required by this constitution. new text end new text begin Sec. 5. new text end new text begin Congressional and legislative districts must be drawn in accordance with the principles listed in this section. If districts cannot be drawn fully in accordance with all principles, priority must be given to the principles in the order in which they are listed, except when doing so would violate federal law, including requirements of the United States Constitution and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended. new text end new text begin Each congressional district must be as nearly equal in total population as practicable. Each legislative district must be substantially equal in total population. The maximum permissible deviation for a legislative district is three percent, plus or minus, from the total population of the ideal district. The population counts used for purposes of drawing district maps must be the block population counts provided to the state under Public Law 94-171, or a successor law, after each decennial census, subject to the correction of any errors acknowledged by the United States Census Bureau, and as adjusted to allocate each person incarcerated in a state or federal correctional facility to the census block of the person's last known address, if the person has a last known address in Minnesota, and to exclude incarcerated persons whose last known address is not located in Minnesota or who do not have a last known address. The legislature may provide procedures by law for the conduct of these allocations and exclusions. new text end new text begin Districts must provide, at a minimum: new text end new text begin (1) the equal opportunity of racial, ethnic, and language minorities to participate in the political process and to elect candidates of their choice, whether alone or in coalition with others; and new text end new text begin (2) sizable racial, ethnic, and language minorities who constitute less than a voting-age majority of a district with an opportunity to substantially influence the outcome of an election. new text end new text begin Federally recognized American Indian Tribal reservations may only be divided if: new text end new text begin (1) the division occurs because a portion of the reservation is not contiguous with another portion of the reservation; or new text end new text begin (2) despite the division, the known population of the reservation remains wholly located within a single district. new text end new text begin Districts must minimize the division of identifiable communities of interest. A community of interest may include a racial, ethnic, or linguistic group or any group with shared experiences or concerns, including but not limited to geographic, regional, social, cultural, historic, socioeconomic, occupational, trade, or transportation interests. Communities of interest do not include relationships with political parties, incumbents, or candidates. A political subdivision is not, by itself, a community of interest. Where communities of interest overlap, greater consideration must be given to those communities of interest whose representational needs would be most benefited from the community's inclusion in a single district. new text end new text begin Each district must be contiguous. Contiguity by water is sufficient if the water is not a serious obstacle to travel within the district. A district with areas that touch only at a point is not contiguous. new text end new text begin Districts must minimize the division of counties, cities, school districts, and towns to the extent practicable. new text end new text begin Sec. 6. new text end new text begin A redistricting plan must not purposely favor or disfavor a candidate or incumbent. The statewide proportion of districts in each redistricting plan that favor a political party must correspond closely to the statewide partisan preferences for the voters of Minnesota for that party. new text end new text begin The statewide proportion of districts in each redistricting plan that favor a political party must be determined by: new text end new text begin (1) calculating the number of districts in the redistricting plan that would have been won by the candidates representing the first political party and the second political party using the two-party vote in each statewide partisan general election held in the preceding six years for which precinct-level data is available; new text end new text begin (2) dividing each of these numbers by the total number of districts in the redistricting plan to obtain the proportion of districts in the redistricting plan that would have been won by candidates representing the first political party and the second political party in each general election; and new text end new text begin (3) calculating the median of these proportions for each political party. new text end new text begin The statewide partisan preferences of the voters of Minnesota must be determined by: new text end new text begin (1) calculating the proportion of the statewide two-party vote received by the candidates representing the first political party and the second political party in each statewide partisan general election held in the preceding six years for which precinct-level data is available; and new text end new text begin (2) calculating the median of these proportions for each political party. new text end new text begin To "correspond closely" means that the statewide proportion of districts in each redistricting plan that favor each political party deviates by no more than three percentage points in either direction, or if this is arithmetically impossible, by the smallest possible proportion that is larger than three percentage points, from the statewide partisan preferences of the voters of Minnesota. new text end new text begin Sec. 7. new text end new text begin If the Independent Redistricting Commission fails to adopt a final redistricting plan by December 31 of the year following a decennial census, each member of the commission may submit, within five business days, no more than one proposed redistricting plan for each redistricting plan that is the subject of impasse for a total vote runoff process. Each commissioner must rank all submitted redistricting plans in decreasing order of preference. The submitted redistricting plan that wins a total vote runoff shall be the final adopted redistricting plan. The chair of the commission must conduct the total vote runoff process and select the final redistricting plan in a public meeting. In the event of a tie, the chair must select, by lot, the final redistricting plan from among the tied plans, in the same public meeting. new text end new text begin Sec. 8. new text end new text begin The supreme court shall have exclusive, original jurisdiction in all cases alleging that a redistricting plan adopted by the commission fails to comply with this article or other applicable law. The commission shall have exclusive standing to defend any action challenging the adoption of a redistricting plan, and notwithstanding the commission's expiration, may reconstitute itself under its own authority for this purpose. new text end new text begin If the supreme court or other court of jurisdiction determines that an adopted redistricting plan does not comply with the requirements of this article or other applicable law, the commission may be reconstituted by court order, or may reconstitute itself under its own authority, for the purpose of adopting a compliant plan. The membership of the reconstituted commission must be the same membership that adopted the noncompliant plan, subject to the filling of vacancies as provided in this article. If, after the commission has been reconstituted, the court finds that a newly adopted redistricting plan does not comply with the requirements of this article, the court may order other appropriate relief, including drawing and ordering new districts under its own authority. A redistricting plan ordered by the supreme court must conform to the requirements of sections 5 and 6. new text end new text begin Sec. 9. new text end new text begin The legislature must provide appropriations by law to sufficiently fund the work of the Independent Redistricting Commission and the Redistricting Commission Applicant Screening Panel, including necessary amounts for administrative, professional, and technical services; litigation costs; and other reasonable expenses. Notwithstanding article XI, if sufficient funds are not appropriated by law, the supreme court may order that money be paid out of the state treasury for this purpose. new text end new text begin Sec. 10. new text end new text begin If any provision of this article, or a subsequent enabling law, is found to be unconstitutional and void, the remaining provisions of this article or the subsequent enabling law remain valid, unless the court finds the valid provisions are so essentially and inseparably connected with, and dependent upon, the void provisions that the court cannot presume the remaining valid provisions would have been enacted without the void provisions, or unless the court finds that the remaining valid provisions, standing alone, are incomplete and incapable of being executed in accordance with their intent. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin SUBMISSION TO VOTERS.new text end new text begin (a) The proposed amendment must be submitted to the people at the 2026 general election. The question submitted must be: new text end new text begin "Shall the Minnesota Constitution be amended to require an independent redistricting commission to adopt boundaries for congressional and legislative districts following a decennial census; to prohibit members of the legislature from serving as lobbyists while in office and for a period of one year after leaving office; to amend requirements related to the timing and process for convening regular legislative sessions; to permit the lieutenant governor to act as a tie breaking vote in the senate, and the secretary of state to act as a tie breaking vote in the house of representatives; to modify the process related to confirmation of gubernatorial appointments by the senate; and to require a majority of all members elected to a house to judge the election returns and eligibility of a member of that house? new text end new text begin Yes . new text end new text begin No . new text end new text begin " new text end new text begin (b) The ballot question title required under Minnesota Statutes, section 204D.15, subdivision 1, must be "Conflict of Interest - Legislative Reform." new text end ARTICLE 2 INDEPENDENT REDISTRICTING COMMISSION; STATUTORY IMPLEMENTATION Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 2.031, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Numbering. new text end new text begin Legislative districts must be numbered in a regular series, beginning with House of Representatives District 1A in the northwest corner of the state and proceeding across the state from west to east, north to south. In a county that includes more than one whole senate district, the districts must be numbered consecutively. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2030, if the constitutional amendments in article 1 are adopted. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 2.731, is amended to read: 2.731 NUMBER OF DISTRICTS. The state of Minnesota is divided into eight congressional districts, each of which is entitled to elect one representative to the Congress of the United States of America.new text begin Congressional district numbers must begin with the first district in the southeast corner of the state and end with the district with the highest number in the northeast corner of the state.new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2030, if the constitutional amendments in article 1 are adopted. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [2.94] REDISTRICTING COMMISSION APPLICANT SCREENING PANEL. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin This section establishes and implements the Redistricting Applicant Screening Panel consistent with the Minnesota Constitution, article XV. Except where otherwise provided, the terms used in this section are defined consistently with those as used in the Minnesota Constitution, article XV. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Appointments; first meeting; compensation. new text end new text begin (a) No later than January 1 of the year of a decennial census, the chief justice of the supreme court must appoint two retired federal or state judges to serve on the Redistricting Commission Applicant Screening Panel. The chief justice must designate one of the retired judges to convene the panel's first meeting. The first meeting must be convened no later than February 15 of the year of a decennial census. No later than March 1 of that year, the two appointees must agree on a third retired federal or state judge to complete the panel's membership. new text end new text begin (b) Members of the panel may be compensated and receive expense reimbursement as provided by section 15.0575, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Ethics; conflicts of interest; ex parte communications. new text end new text begin (a) Members of the panel are public officials for purposes of chapter 10A. In addition to the prohibitions in section 10A.071, a member of the panel may not accept a gift as defined in that section from a member of the legislature, a member of Congress, or a staff member to a member of the legislature or Congress. new text end new text begin (b) Members of the panel may not communicate with a member of the legislature, a member of Congress, or a staff member to a member of the legislature or Congress about the panel's work. new text end new text begin (c) The prohibitions in this subdivision apply during the period beginning at the time of the panel member's appointment and until the panel member has completed the panel member's work. A member of the legislature, a member of Congress, or a staff member to a member of the legislature or Congress must not give a gift, promise a future gift, or engage in communication that a panel member is prohibited from receiving under this subdivision, and must not request another person to give a gift, promise a future gift, or engage in communication with a panel member, directly or indirectly, in an attempt to circumvent the prohibitions of this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Outreach and solicitation of applications. new text end new text begin The panel must develop and implement an outreach plan to inform the public about the work of the Independent Redistricting Commission and to encourage interested persons to apply for appointment. The panel must make an application form available for this purpose. The panel must make reasonable efforts to ensure the application process is widely publicized and distributed through media and other available channels, with a goal of facilitating a large application pool consisting of well-qualified individuals who reflect a geographically and demographically representative cross section of the state. Information about the work of the commission and the application process must be made available in multiple languages. The panel must consult with the state demographer for the purpose of ensuring that materials in accessible languages are targeted to appropriate regions of the state. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Application contents; required disclosures. new text end new text begin In addition to other information as determined by the panel, the application for membership on the Independent Redistricting Commission must require each applicant to disclose the information required by section 10A.09 and the following: new text end new text begin (1) contributions made by the applicant to federal, state, or local candidates for elective office, political parties, and political committees, including direct and in-kind contributions during the current year and immediately preceding six years; new text end new text begin (2) the applicant's history of partisan affiliations, including primary ballots voted, nonmonetary contributions to political campaigns, and any other political engagement, including but not limited to involvement in political campaigns or other political organizations whether paid or volunteer; new text end new text begin (3) the identity of any family members who would be ineligible to serve on the commission according to the requirements of this constitution; new text end new text begin (4) personal or professional relationships with persons during the current year or the immediately preceding six years who would be ineligible to serve on the commission according to the requirements of this constitution; and new text end new text begin (5) any financial or other information that may be required by law. new text end new text begin These disclosures must be posted on the panel's website. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Open meetings; data practices. new text end new text begin The panel is subject to chapters 13 and 13D. Data on applicants for appointment to the commission are governed by section 13.601, subdivision 3, except that data required to be disclosed under this section or the Minnesota Constitution, article XV, is also public. Comments submitted by members of the public about applicants for appointment to the commission are private data, as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 12, on the member of the public who submitted the comment. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin General powers; staffing and professional services. new text end new text begin (a) The panel has the powers necessary to carry out its responsibilities as required by the constitution and this chapter. The panel may employ nonpartisan staff and enter other agreements to secure necessary administrative, professional, and technical services as it deems necessary. Staff employed by the panel serve in the unclassified service and owe a duty of care and duty of loyalty to the panel as a whole. Staff, and any other person retained by the panel for the purpose of providing professional support, must be screened for potential biases and conflicts of interest and must demonstrate the experience, expertise, and skills necessary to assist the panel in its work. new text end new text begin (b) Prior to January 1 in the year of the decennial census, the director of the Legislative Coordinating Commission must contract with a consultant who will provide the panel with operational and logistical support. The Legislative Coordinating Commission must assist the panel in hiring additional staff and securing adequate office and meeting space. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The panel expires upon its certification to the chief justice of the supreme court that it has established and transmitted to the chief justice and to the Independent Redistricting Commission its pools of applicants for appointment to the commission consistent with the requirements of this section and the Minnesota Constitution, article XV, except that the panel chair must continue to perform any duties required by the Minnesota Constitution, this section, and section 2.95, as applicable. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2030, and applies to the 2030 redistricting cycle and thereafter, if the constitutional amendments in article 1 are adopted. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [2.95] INDEPENDENT REDISTRICTING COMMISSION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin This section establishes and implements the Independent Redistricting Commission consistent with the Minnesota Constitution, article XV. Except where otherwise provided: new text end new text begin (1) the terms used in this section are defined consistently with those as used in the Minnesota Constitution, article XV; and new text end new text begin (2) the dates referenced in this section refer to those dates in the year following a federal decennial census. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Appointments; first meeting; compensation and removal. new text end new text begin (a) No later than October 15 of the year of a decennial census, the chief justice of the supreme court must select by random lot the members of the Independent Redistricting Commission from among the applicant pools established by the Redistricting Commission Applicant Screening Panel, consistent with the requirements of the Minnesota Constitution, article XV. new text end new text begin (b) No later than November 15 of the year of a decennial census, the chair of the Redistricting Commission Applicant Screening Panel must convene the first meeting of the commission. The panel chair must preside at commission meetings until a commission chair is elected, but the panel chair is not a commission member and, except for ministerial functions required by law and necessary to facilitate its organization, must not otherwise participate in the commission's work. The commission must be fully seated and must elect a chair and other officers from among all appointed members no later than 60 days following its first meeting. new text end new text begin (c) Members of the commission are entitled to compensation and expense reimbursement, consistent with the amounts provided by section 15.0575, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin (d) A member of the commission may only be removed for cause by a vote of 12 members, including the vote of at least one member supporting the first political party, one member supporting the second political party, and one member that is not affiliated with either the first or second political party. Prior to a vote to remove a member, the commission must provide notice, a public hearing, and an opportunity for members of the public to comment on the proposed removal. Cause for removal includes but is not limited to the following: new text end new text begin (1) knowing failure to disclose information required by law; new text end new text begin (2) willful disregard for the requirements governing the conduct of redistricting provided by the constitution or applicable law; new text end new text begin (3) wanton and willful neglect of duty or gross misconduct or malfeasance in office; new text end new text begin (4) a member's incapacity or inability to perform required duties; new text end new text begin (5) any action that undermines the public's trust in the commission or in the conduct of a fair redistricting process; new text end new text begin (6) engaging in ex parte communication about the work of the commission with a member of the legislature, a member of Congress, or a staff member to a member of the legislature or Congress, in violation of this section; and new text end new text begin (7) missing three consecutive commission meetings. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Ethics; conflicts of interest; ex parte communications. new text end new text begin (a) Members of the commission are public officials for purposes of chapter 10A. In addition to the prohibitions in section 10A.071, a member of the commission may not accept a gift as defined in that section from a member of the legislature, a member of Congress, or a staff member to a member of the legislature or Congress. new text end new text begin (b) Members of the commission may not communicate with a member of the legislature, a member of Congress, or a staff member to a member of the legislature or Congress about the commission's work. A staff member to a member of the legislature may communicate with a staff member to the commission to the extent required to fulfill a duty of the constitution or this chapter. new text end new text begin (c) The prohibitions in this subdivision apply during the period beginning at the time of the member's appointment and until the commission has adopted and filed its redistricting plans with the secretary of state, and during any period in which the commission is reconstituted pursuant to its own authority or by court order. A member of the legislature, a member of Congress, or a staff member to a member of the legislature or Congress may not give a gift, promise a future gift, or engage in communication that a commission member is prohibited from receiving under this subdivision, and may not request another person to give a gift, promise a future gift, or engage in communication with a commission member, directly or indirectly, in an attempt to circumvent the prohibitions of this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Open meetings; data practices; language access. new text end new text begin (a) The commission is subject to chapters 13 and 13D. A map proposal that is created by the commission or its staff, and any communications or supporting data associated with a map proposal, are nonpublic data as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 9, until the map proposal is presented to the commission in a public meeting. Supporting data do not include preliminary drafts of a map proposal or communications related to a preliminary draft. The commission may disclose any of its data at any time if disclosure would aid the commission in considering and preparing its proposals. new text end new text begin (b) Consistent with section 13D.015, the commission may permit its members to participate in a congressional district hearing by interactive technology, provided that at least one member of the commission is physically present at a meeting location in the designated congressional district. Notwithstanding section 13D.015, a commission member need not be present at the commission's regular meeting location during a congressional district hearing. new text end new text begin (c) At a minimum, commission materials must be made available in all languages in which voting materials in any jurisdiction of the state are required to be distributed under section 204B.295 or other applicable federal or state law. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Schedule of hearings; public hearing and administrative procedures. new text end new text begin The commission must adopt a schedule of public hearings and necessary hearing and administrative procedures to guide the conduct of its work. The schedule and procedures must be posted on the commission's website. The schedule and procedures are not rules for purposes of chapter 14, and section 14.386 does not apply. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin General powers; staffing and professional services. new text end new text begin (a) The commission has the powers necessary to carry out its responsibilities as required by the constitution and this chapter. The commission may employ nonpartisan staff and enter other agreements to secure necessary legal counsel, information technology, geographic information systems, and other administrative, professional, and technical services as it deems necessary. Staff employed by the commission serve in the unclassified service and owe a duty of care and duty of loyalty to the commission as a whole. Commission staff, and any other person retained by the commission for the purpose of providing professional support, must be screened for potential biases and conflicts of interest and must demonstrate the experience, expertise, and skills necessary to assist the commission in its work. new text end new text begin (b) Prior to January 1 in the year of the decennial census, the director of the Legislative Coordinating Commission must contract with a consultant who will provide the commission with operational and logistical support. The Legislative Coordinating Commission must assist the commission in hiring additional staff and securing adequate office and meeting space. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Data to be used. new text end new text begin (a) The geographic areas and population counts used in maps, tables, and legal descriptions of legislative and congressional districts must be those used by the Geographic Information Services (GIS) Office of the Legislative Coordinating Commission. The population counts must be the block population counts provided to the state under Public Law 94-171 after each decennial census, subject to correction of any errors acknowledged by the United States Census Bureau, and subject to any other adjustments and exclusions required by law. Both the commission and the GIS Office must make this data available to the public on their websites. new text end new text begin (b) A redistricting plan must not be considered for adoption until the plan's block equivalency file has been submitted to the GIS Office in a form prescribed by the GIS Office. The block equivalency file must show the district to which each census block has been assigned. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Technical review and corrections. new text end new text begin (a) Prior to final adoption of a redistricting plan, the commission must engage in a technical review of the plan. A technical review includes ensuring that the plan encompasses all the territory of this state and that no territory is omitted or duplicated. At a meeting where a redistricting plan is proposed for final adoption, the commission may amend the plan for the purpose of making technical corrections as necessary to meet the following principles: new text end new text begin (1) if a territory in this state is not named in the redistricting plan but lies within the boundaries of a district, it is a part of the district within which it lies; new text end new text begin (2) if a territory in this state is not named in the redistricting plan but lies between the boundaries of two or more districts, it is a part of the contiguous district having the smallest population; new text end new text begin (3) if a territory in this state is assigned in the redistricting plan to two or more districts, it is a part of the district having the smallest population; new text end new text begin (4) if a territory in this state is assigned to a district that consists of other territory containing a majority of the population of the district but with which it is not contiguous, the territory is a part of the contiguous district having the smallest population; and new text end new text begin (5) if the description of a district boundary line that divides a political subdivision is ambiguous because a highway, street, railroad track, power transmission line, river, creek, or other physical feature or census block boundary that forms part of the district boundary is omitted or is not properly named or has been changed, or because a compass direction for the boundary line is wrong, the commission may add or correct the name or compass direction and resolve the ambiguity in favor of creating districts of contiguous territory of substantially equal population that do not divide political subdivisions more than is necessary to meet constitutional requirements. new text end new text begin (b) In addition to meeting the principles described in paragraph (a), at a meeting where a redistricting plan is proposed for final adoption, the commission may adopt amendments to the plan for the purpose of incorporating any technical corrections that may be recommended by the secretary of state. new text end new text begin (c) If a technical error in a redistricting plan is discovered after the commission has dissolved, the chief administrative law judge, after notifying the secretary of state, the Legislative Coordinating Commission, and the chief justice of the supreme court, may order a correction consistent with the principles listed in this subdivision. The chief administrative law judge must provide a copy of each correction order to each affected county auditor and municipal clerk. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Duty of secretary of state. new text end new text begin The secretary of state shall provide copies of the relevant portions of a filed redistricting plan to each county auditor, who shall provide a copy of the relevant portions of the plan to each municipal clerk within the county. The secretary of state, with the cooperation of the commissioner of administration, shall make copies of the plan file, maps, and tables available to the public for the cost of publication. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2030, and applies to the 2030 redistricting cycle and thereafter, if the constitutional amendments in article 1 are adopted. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.01, subdivision 35, is amended to read: Subd. 35. Public official. "Public official" means any: (1) member of the legislature; (2) individual employed by the legislature as secretary of the senate, legislative auditor, director of the Legislative Budget Office, chief clerk of the house of representatives, revisor of statutes, or researcher, legislative analyst, fiscal analyst, or attorney in the Office of Senate Counsel, Research and Fiscal Analysis, House Research, or the House Fiscal Analysis Department; (3) constitutional officer in the executive branch and the officer's chief administrative deputy; (4) solicitor general or deputy, assistant, or special assistant attorney general; (5) commissioner, deputy commissioner, or assistant commissioner of any state department or agency as listed in section 15.01 or 15.06, or the state chief information officer; (6) member, chief administrative officer, or deputy chief administrative officer of a state board or commission that has either the power to adopt, amend, or repeal rules under chapter 14, or the power to adjudicate contested cases or appeals under chapter 14; (7) individual employed in the executive branch who is authorized to adopt, amend, or repeal rules under chapter 14 or adjudicate contested cases under chapter 14; (8) executive director of the State Board of Investment; (9) deputy of any official listed in clauses (7) and (8); (10) judge of the Workers' Compensation Court of Appeals; (11) administrative law judge or compensation judge in the State Office of Administrative Hearings or unemployment law judge in the Department of Employment and Economic Development; (12) member, regional administrator, division director, general counsel, or operations manager of the Metropolitan Council; (13) member or chief administrator of a metropolitan agency; (14) director of the Division of Alcohol and Gambling Enforcement in the Department of Public Safety; (15) member or executive director of the Higher Education Facilities Authority; (16) member of the board of directors or president of Enterprise Minnesota, Inc.; (17) member of the board of directors or executive director of the Minnesota State High School League; (18) member of the Minnesota Ballpark Authority established in section 473.755; (19) citizen member of the Legislative-Citizen Commission on Minnesota Resources; (20) manager of a watershed district, or member of a watershed management organization as defined under section 103B.205, subdivision 13; (21) supervisor of a soil and water conservation district; (22) director of Explore Minnesota Tourism; (23) citizen member of the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council established in section 97A.056; (24) citizen member of the Clean Water Council established in section 114D.30; (25) member or chief executive of the Minnesota Sports Facilities Authority established in section 473J.07; (26) district court judge, appeals court judge, or supreme court justice; (27) county commissioner; (28) member of the Greater Minnesota Regional Parks and Trails Commission; (29) member of the Destination Medical Center Corporation established in section 469.41; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (30) chancellor or member of the Board of Trustees of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universitiesnew text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (31) member of the Redistricting Commission Applicant Screening Panel, or member of the Independent Redistricting Commissionnew text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2030, and applies to the 2030 redistricting cycle and thereafter, if the constitutional amendments in article 1 are adopted. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 2.91, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2030, and applies to the 2030 redistricting cycle and thereafter, if the constitutional amendments in article 1 are adopted. new text end ARTICLE 3 CITIZENS ADVISORY REDISTRICTING COMMISSION. Section 1. new text begin [2A.30] REDISTRICTING; DEFINITIONS; ADJUSTMENT OF DATES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section and sections 2A.31 to 2A.33, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Applicant pools" means the lists of applicants described in section 2A.31, subdivision 2, paragraph (i). new text end new text begin (c) "Executive director" means the executive director of the Legislative Coordinating Commission. new text end new text begin (d) "GIS office" means the Geographic Information Services Office of the Legislative Coordinating Commission. new text end new text begin (e) "Largest political party in the state" means the political party whose candidate received the greatest number of votes for legislative seats in the state in the most recent general election. new text end new text begin (f) "Legislative Coordinating Commission" is the entity established in section 3.303. new text end new text begin (g) "Second largest political party in the state" means the political party whose candidate received the second greatest number of votes for legislative seats in the state in the most recent general election. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Adjustment of dates. new text end new text begin If any date prescribed in this chapter falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, then the date is extended to the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [2A.31] REDISTRICTING COMMISSION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin In each year ending in zero, a Citizens Advisory Redistricting Commission is created to draw the boundaries of legislative and congressional districts in accordance with the principles established in section 2A.32. The redistricting commission consists of 15 members of the public. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Appointment. new text end new text begin (a) The application and appointment process for members of the Citizens Advisory Redistricting Commission shall be the process described in section 15.0597, except as otherwise provided by this section. new text end new text begin (b) By January 1 of each year ending in zero, the secretary of state shall open a widely publicized process and circulate applications in a manner that encourages wide public participation of eligible residents from different regions of the state to apply for membership on the commission. Applications are public data under chapter 13 and shall be made available on the secretary of state's website or a comparable means of communicating with the public. Applications must be received by March 1 of the year ending in zero. new text end new text begin (c) The secretary of state shall design and provide an application form that must clearly state the legal obligations and expectations of potential appointees. Information required of applicants must include but is not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) a statement from applicants affirming they meet the requirements of subdivision 3; new text end new text begin (2) an oath affirming the applicant submits the application declaring the truthfulness of its contents under penalty of perjury; new text end new text begin (3) the applicant's demographic information, including but not limited to gender, race, ethnicity, and year of birth; new text end new text begin (4) the applicant's professional background; new text end new text begin (5) the applicant's past experience working with others to build consensus; new text end new text begin (6) the applicant's level of understanding about Minnesota communities, neighborhoods, geographic regions, or demographics across the state; new text end new text begin (7) a description of the applicant's past political activity; new text end new text begin (8) a list of all political and civic organizations to which the applicant has belonged within the five years prior to the application; new text end new text begin (9) a statement indicating with which political party the applicant identifies or that the applicant identifies with no party. For purposes of this clause, identifying with a political party means that the applicant is in general agreement with the principles of the party; and new text end new text begin (10) any other information required to determine eligibility to serve on the commission. new text end new text begin (d) The secretary of state must review applications as they are received to ensure that each application is complete and each applicant has signed the oath attesting to the truthfulness of the information contained in the application. No later than March 15 of the year ending in zero, the secretary of state must forward the completed application of each eligible person to the executive director. The secretary of state must not forward any application that is incomplete or any application by a person who has not signed off on the oath attesting to the accuracy of the information contained in the application. If the secretary of state does not forward an application, the secretary of state must notify the applicant that the applicant's application was not forwarded and the reason why. new text end new text begin (e) The Legislative Coordinating Commission executive director shall remove from the applicant pool individuals who do not qualify including: new text end new text begin (1) a person who has not resided in Minnesota for at least one year prior to their application submission or is not eligible to vote; new text end new text begin (2) a current member of the legislature or Congress; new text end new text begin (3) a person under contract with, who serves as a consultant or staff to, or who has or has had an immediate family relationship with the governor, a member of the legislature, or a member of Congress during the ten years immediately preceding the date of application; new text end new text begin (4) a person who serves or has served during the ten years immediately preceding the date of application as a public official, as defined in section 10A.01, subdivision 35, clauses (1) to (5), (12), (13), (16), (26), and (27); and new text end new text begin (5) a person, or member of the person's immediate family, who is or during the ten years immediately preceding the date of application has: new text end new text begin (i) been appointed to, elected to, or a candidate for state office; new text end new text begin (ii) served as an officer, employee, contractor, or paid consultant of a political party or of the campaign committee of a candidate for elective federal or state office; new text end new text begin (iii) served as an elected or appointed member of a political party state committee, as defined by section 10A.01, subdivision 36, or a delegate to a national convention of a political party; new text end new text begin (iv) registered as a lobbyist, registrant, or client with the federal government under the Lobbying Disclosure Act of 1995 as amended or as a state lobbyist or principal with the Campaign Finance and Public Disclosure Board under chapter 10A; new text end new text begin (v) served as paid congressional or legislative staff; or new text end new text begin (vi) been found by the Campaign Finance and Public Disclosure Board to have violated section 10A.27. new text end new text begin For the purposes of this subdivision, a member of a person's immediate family means a sibling, spouse, or parent, including half, step, and in-law relationships. While serving on the commission, commissioners must not campaign for elective office or actively participate in or contribute to a political campaign nor run for federal, state, or local political office for a period of up to ten years after the commission expires. new text end new text begin (f) By February 15 in the year ending in zero the executive director of the Legislative Coordinating Commission shall appoint a Redistricting Advisory Group consisting of, at a minimum, the executive directors of the Minnesota Council on Latino Affairs, the Council for Minnesotans of African Heritage, the Minnesota Indian Affairs Council, the Council on Asian Pacific Minnesotans, the Council on LGBTQIA2S+ Minnesotans, the Minnesota Youth Council, the Minnesota Council on Disability, and the Minnesota Commission of the Deaf, DeafBlind and Hard of Hearing. new text end new text begin (g) The Redistricting Advisory Group shall serve as advisors to the executive director and must work within the process described in paragraph (i), and subdivision 5, clause (8), to ensure diversity of applicants throughout the process. new text end new text begin (h) Members of the Redistricting Advisory Group must participate in a nonpartisan manner and serve without predisposition or bias on issues related to the state's representation for redistricting boundaries. The Redistricting Advisory Group must work with the executive director as outlined to foster diversity of applicant pools throughout the process and in their role as experts on matters pertaining to their respective communities. It is not intended that formulas or specific ratios be applied for this purpose. new text end new text begin (i) By April 1 of the year ending in zero, the executive director, in consultation with the Redistricting Advisory Group, shall jointly screen and sort the applicants into three applicant pools: one pool for applicants identifying with the largest political party in this state; one pool for applicants identifying with the second largest political party in the state; and one pool for applicants identifying with no political party or a political party that is not the largest or second largest political party in the state. The executive director must review the applicants in each applicant pool and narrow each pool down to 40 applicants based on a review of each applicant's relevant analytical skills, the ability to be impartial, and the ability to promote consensus on the commission and appreciation for Minnesota's diverse demographics, communities, and geography as documented in the application. To the extent practicable, the executive director must ensure that each applicant pool reflects the gender, socioeconomic, age, racial, language, ethnic, and geographic diversity of the state. Each congressional district must be represented by at least two applicants in each applicant pool. new text end new text begin (j) If there is an insufficient number of available applicants to select a 40-applicant pool, then the pool consists of only those applicants who did meet the requirements. new text end new text begin (k) By April 1 in each year ending in zero, the executive director must provide each applicant pool list to the majority leaders and minority leaders of the house of representatives and the senate. By April 15 of each year ending in zero, the majority leaders and minority leaders of the house of representatives and the senate must each select five applicants from their party's list and forward the names of the applicants to the Legislative Coordinating Commission's executive director. The executive director must make the list and applications available to all legislative leaders. In selecting applicants, the executive director or a leader must not select more than one applicant from any congressional district. new text end new text begin (l) By April 29 of each year ending in zero, 12 names must be stricken from the list as follows: new text end new text begin (1) the senate majority leader must strike three applicants from the applicants selected by the senate minority leader; new text end new text begin (2) the senate minority leader must strike three applicants from the applicants selected by the senate majority leader; new text end new text begin (3) the house majority leader must strike three applicants from the applicants selected by the house minority leader; and new text end new text begin (4) the house minority leader must strike three applicants from the applicants selected by the house majority leader. new text end new text begin (m) The legislative leaders must forward the eight remaining names consisting of four applicants identifying with the largest political party in the state and four applicants identifying with the second largest political party in the state to the executive director. These eight individuals shall serve on the Citizens Advisory Redistricting Commission. new text end new text begin (n) By April 29 of each year ending in zero, the executive director must, by lottery, select four applicants from the pool of 40 applicants who do not identify with a party or identify with a party other than the first or second largest political party described in paragraph (i). Together with the eight individuals selected by the legislative leaders, these twelve individuals shall serve on the Citizens Advisory Redistricting Commission. new text end new text begin (o) No later than May 15 in each year ending in the number zero, the twelve advisory commissioners shall convene and assess the commission's demographic diversity within the twelve members and must review and select six more applicants from the remaining applicants from the pool of 40 applicants originally selected by legislative leadership and appoint six applicants to the commission as follows: two from the remaining pool of applicants identifying with the largest political party in Minnesota, two from the remaining pool of applicants identifying with the second largest political party in Minnesota, and two from the remaining pool of applicants identifying with no political party or with a political party that is not the largest or second largest political party in Minnesota. The six individuals must be approved by at least two-thirds affirmative votes which must include at least two votes of commissioners registered from each of the two largest parties and two votes from commissioners who are not affiliated with either of the two largest political parties in Minnesota. These six new appointees shall be chosen to ensure the Citizens Advisory Redistricting Commission reflects this state's diversity, including but not limited to racial, ethnic, geographic, and gender diversity. However, it is not intended that formulas or specific ratios be applied for this purpose. new text end new text begin (p) The executive director of the Legislative Coordinating Commission shall report the 15 names selected to the secretary of state. These 15 individuals shall serve as members of the Citizens Advisory Redistricting Commission and shall not include more than two commissioners from any one congressional district. new text end new text begin (q) The secretary of state's actions under this subdivision are not subject to chapter 14. new text end new text begin (r) Before serving on the Citizens Advisory Redistricting Commission, every person shall take and subscribe an oath to faithfully perform the duties of that office. The oath must be filed with the secretary of state. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Eligibility of public members. new text end new text begin (a) A person is eligible to serve if the person has been a resident of Minnesota for at least a year at the time of the submission of the application and is not an elected official. new text end new text begin (b) The following persons are not eligible to serve as a commissioner: new text end new text begin (1) a person who is not eligible to vote in the state of Minnesota; new text end new text begin (2) a current member of the legislature or Congress; new text end new text begin (3) a person under contract with, who serves as a consultant or staff to, or who has or has had an immediate family relationship with the governor, a member of the legislature, or a member of Congress during the ten years immediately preceding the date of application; new text end new text begin (4) a person who serves or has served during the ten years immediately preceding the date of application as a public official, as defined in section 10A.01, subdivision 35, clauses (1) to (5), (12), (13), (16), (26), and (27); and new text end new text begin (5) a person, or member of the person's immediate family, who is or during the ten years immediately preceding the date of application has: new text end new text begin (i) been appointed to, elected to, or a candidate for federal or state office; new text end new text begin (ii) served as an officer, employee, contractor, or paid consultant of a political party or of the campaign committee of a candidate for elective federal or state office; new text end new text begin (iii) served as an elected or appointed member of a political party state committee, as defined by section 10A.01, subdivision 36, or a delegate to a national convention of a political party; new text end new text begin (iv) registered as a lobbyist, registrant, or client with the federal government under the Lobbying Disclosure Act of 1995 as amended or as a state lobbyist or principal with the Campaign Finance and Public Disclosure Board under chapter 10A; new text end new text begin (v) served as paid congressional or legislative staff; or new text end new text begin (vi) been found by the Campaign Finance and Public Disclosure Board to have violated section 10A.27. new text end new text begin (c) While serving on the Citizens Advisory Redistricting Commission, commissioners must not campaign for elective office or actively participate in or contribute to a political campaign nor run for state or local political office for a period of up to ten years after the Citizens Advisory Redistricting Commission expires. new text end new text begin (d) For the purposes of this subdivision, a member of a person's immediate family means a sibling, spouse, or parent, including half, step, and in-law relationships. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Removal; filling vacancies. new text end new text begin (a) Each commissioner shall serve for the entire term of the commission unless the commissioner is removed or otherwise vacates the office. new text end new text begin (b) A commissioner's position on the Citizens Advisory Redistricting Commission is deemed vacant if the commissioner, having been appointed as a registered elector who is not affiliated with a political party, affiliates with a political party before the Minnesota Legislature has approved a plan pursuant to subdivision 25. A commissioner's position on the Citizens Advisory Redistricting Commission is also deemed vacant if the commissioner, having been affiliated with one of the state's two largest political parties at the time of appointment, affiliates with a different political party or becomes unaffiliated with any political party before the Minnesota Legislature has approved a plan pursuant to subdivision 25. new text end new text begin (c) The removal of an officer from an officer position requires a two-thirds affirmative vote with at least one commissioner identifying with the largest political party in the state, one commissioner identifying with the second largest political party in the state, and one commissioner identifying with no political party or with a political party that is not the largest or second largest in the state. new text end new text begin (d) If the basis for the commissioner's removal is the commissioner's refusal to vote as part of a collective effort to disrupt the process or vote of the commission, the member or members may be removed after a finding by the chair as described in this section and a two-thirds vote of those commissioners present. new text end new text begin (e) Removal of a member takes place immediately after a finding by the chair and must be by a two-thirds vote of all members of the advisory commission, including at least one member identifying with the largest political party in the state, one member identifying with the second largest political party in the state, and one member identifying with no political party or with a political party that is not the largest or second largest in the state. new text end new text begin (f) After notice and a hearing, the advisory commission may also remove a commissioner for malfeasance or nonfeasance during the term of service in the performance of the duties of the advisory commission or for missing three consecutive meetings. After the second consecutive missed meeting and before the next meeting, the chair or a designee must notify the commissioner in writing that the member may be removed for missing the next meeting. The definitions in section 211C.01 apply to this subdivision. new text end new text begin (g) The chair must submit a written notice to the Legislative Coordinating Commission executive director stating the grounds that another member's office should be declared vacant under this subdivision. This written notice shall: (1) be dated and signed; and (2) provide a detailed factual basis in support of the allegations causing the removal of another member. The factual basis shall include the specific facts and factual foundation on which the removal is based. Supporting documentation, if any, shall be included. new text end new text begin (h) Any vacancy on the advisory commission, including one that occurs due to death, mental incapacity, resignation, criminal conviction of a serious crime, removal, failure to meet the qualifications of appointment, refusal or inability to accept an appointment, or having been found to have participated in a communication prohibited by subdivision 20 or 21 or conduct prohibited by subdivision 22, or otherwise, must be filled as soon as possible, but no later than seven days after the vacancy occurred, by the executive director from the designated pool of eligible applicants for that commissioner's position and in the same manner as the originally chosen commissioner, except that no commissioner chosen to fill a vacancy would be bypassed for appointment if all congressional districts are represented by at least one commissioner. If no remaining finalists described in the same pool under subdivision 2, paragraph (i), are available for service, the secretary of state shall open the application process again and the executive director shall establish a new list of applicants, as provided in subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin Each commissioner shall perform their duties in a manner that is impartial and reinforces public confidence in the integrity of the redistricting process. Commissioners must disclose the presence of a conflict of interest, or raise a potential conflict of interest when the agenda item is called, prior to the start of discussion or deliberation. In addition to other duties prescribed by law, the advisory commission shall: new text end new text begin (1) attend nonpartisan redistricting training held by a nationally recognized nonpartisan organization or the Legislative Coordinating Commission; new text end new text begin (2) attend training on the Minnesota Data Practices Act and Open Meetings Act; new text end new text begin (3) determine its own rules and order. Within ten weeks of being established, the Citizens Advisory Redistricting Commission must adopt administrative rules to govern the commission's process. The rules must be adopted at an open meeting, with advance notice of the meeting, and members of the public must be provided with an opportunity to provide comment on the rules. The procedures and rules referenced in this subdivision are not subject to chapter 14 or section 14.386. new text end new text begin A member who has a conflict between a personal interest and the public interest in the procurement process of securing staff, consultants, general counsel, or any other professional services, shall fully disclose to the commission in writing as soon as they learn of the potential conflict of interest the nature of the conflict. A member shall not participate in the discussion or deliberation or vote upon any matter if a conflict exists; new text end new text begin (4) adopt procedures and rules to carry out the provisions of this section and any laws enacted by the legislature, including the procurement of professional services such as GIS, general counsel, and other subject matter expert staff. These procedures and rules are not subject to chapter 14 or section 14.386; new text end new text begin (5) act as the legislature's recipient of the final redistricting data and other files relevant to redistricting from the United States Census Bureau; new text end new text begin (6) comply with requirements to disclose and preserve public records, as specified in the Data Practices Act, chapter 13, and section 138.17; new text end new text begin (7) hold open meetings and public hearings throughout the state pursuant to the Open Meetings Law, chapter 13D; new text end new text begin (8) work with the Redistricting Advisory Group to host a minimum of eight statewide informational town halls at community locations most likely to be known by individuals living in the community and at a time most likely to reasonably yield the highest attendance, allowing for basic information regarding the role of the advisory commission, how commission members were selected, and why community member participation matters in the redistricting process; new text end new text begin (9) provide public notice at least seven days in advance of any public meeting or public hearing. The notice and agenda must be posted on the commission's website and published in local news sources. The public notice shall also be disseminated leveraging social media, media frequently used by disenfranchised Minnesotans, or other community-based communication channels. The advisory commission may also partner with community-based nonpartisan organizations in an effort to more widely disseminate the notice to directly impacted communities. The notice and agenda must be provided in all languages required for voting materials under the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965, United States Code, title 52, section 10503, in the congressional district in which the public meeting is scheduled; new text end new text begin (10) publish a draft agenda at least 72 hours before each public meeting or hearing; new text end new text begin (11) prepare and publish a report before any public meeting or hearing and no later than ten weeks after all members of the advisory commission are appointed that describes the commission's general priorities and intentions for utilizing redistricting criteria in its decision-making process, including a discussion on how the commission will balance competing requirements; new text end new text begin (12) adopt a schedule for interested persons to submit proposed plans and to respond to plans proposed by others. The redistricting commission shall also adopt standards to govern the format of plans submitted. Adoption of the schedule and standards under this subdivision is not subject to chapter 14 or section 14.386. The advisory commission must post submitted plans to its website as soon as practicable; new text end new text begin (13) subject to subdivisions 20 and 21, provide direction to commission staff on drawing maps; new text end new text begin (14) subject to subdivisions 20 and 21, review and direct modifications of maps to commission staff; new text end new text begin (15) prepare and publish reports on the following: new text end new text begin (i) all plans discussed by the full advisory commission, including all publicly submitted plans and draft plans; new text end new text begin (ii) a summary of all public input received in each comment period; new text end new text begin (iii) a summary of the data the advisory commission used to create those plans; new text end new text begin (iv) analysis of the maps using redistricting metrics; and new text end new text begin (v) any other information that provides the basis on which the advisory commission made decisions to achieve compliance with constitutional and statutory requirements; new text end new text begin (16) make reasonable efforts to schedule hearings in the evenings, on weekends, and at other times that most residents in that region are able to attend; new text end new text begin (17) whenever possible, use technology that allows for real-time virtual participation and feedback for all hearings. All audiovisual recordings of the advisory commission public meetings and public hearings must be maintained on the commission's website indefinitely; new text end new text begin (18) make reasonable efforts to make available translation and interpreter services for limited English-speaking individuals and those needing accommodations in compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act. The redistricting commission may contract with an entity that provides interpreter services through telephonic and video remote technologies; and new text end new text begin (19) provide notices of the availability of both plans and reports in all languages required for voting materials under the federal Voting Rights Act of 1964, United States Code, title 52, section 10503, and as required for compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act for each congressional district. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Rules of order. new text end new text begin Advisory commission meetings shall be conducted according to the current edition of Robert's Rules of Order, subject to any procedures to the contrary set forth in these rules, applicable law, or such other rules adopted by the commission. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Quorum. new text end new text begin (a) A quorum must be present to conduct the business of the advisory commission meetings and hold public hearings. The quorum shall consist of twelve members, including at least one member affiliated with each of the major parties and one nonaffiliated member. new text end new text begin (b) If there is not a quorum due to a collective effort by one or more commissioners to disrupt the work, process, or vote of the commission, a quorum consists of the majority of commissioners. The requirement for at least one member from each majority party and one nonaffiliated member is not applicable under this circumstance. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Minutes. new text end new text begin Minutes of all meetings, including votes on all official actions taken at those meetings, shall be kept by the Legislative Coordinating Commission. All decisions of the advisory commission shall be recorded, and the record of its decisions shall be readily available to any member of the public as required by law and shall be provided without charge. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Journal of proceedings. new text end new text begin An account of all proceedings and the public record of the advisory commission shall be kept by the Legislative Coordinating Commission and shall constitute the official record of the advisory commission and be posted to the commission's website. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Right of floor. new text end new text begin Any member desiring to speak shall be recognized by the chair, or vice-chair when the chair is not present, and shall confine their remarks to one subject under consideration or to be considered. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Right to general counsel. new text end new text begin The Citizens Advisory Redistricting Commission has a right to retain general counsel. The general counsel of the advisory commission shall be experienced and knowledgeable in the area of election law and voting rights and attend all meetings of the commission unless excused. The general counsel shall, upon request, give an opinion, either written or oral, on questions of law. The general counsel may make recommendations to the commission and shall have the right to take part in all public discussions of the commission but shall have no vote. General counsel shall act as parliamentarian of the commission and serve as its designated data practices act responsible authority in lieu of the executive director. new text end new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Voting. new text end new text begin (a) Except as otherwise provided in these rules or by law, administrative actions including calling to order, adjourning, scheduling hearings, and other such actions shall require the approval of a majority of commissioners entitled to vote. The vote is required for the following actions. new text end new text begin (b) A majority of the appointed commissioners must approve rules and procedural decisions. new text end new text begin (c) Election of the chair and vice-chair requires a two-thirds affirmative vote with at least one commissioner identifying with the largest political party in the state, one commissioner identifying with the second largest political party in the state, and one commissioner identifying with no political party or with a political party that is not the largest or second largest in the state. new text end new text begin (d) Adoption of the final plan for submission to the Minnesota Legislature and the adoption of a revised plan after a plan is returned to the advisory commission from the Minnesota Legislature require the affirmative vote of two-thirds of commissioners with at least one commissioner identifying with the largest political party in the state, one commissioner identifying with the second largest political party in the state, and one commissioner identifying with no political party or with a political party that is not the largest or second largest in the state. new text end new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin Duty to vote; abstaining. new text end new text begin (a) Commissioners present at a meeting shall vote on every matter before the commission, unless otherwise excused or prohibited from voting as follows: new text end new text begin (1) a commissioner may abstain from voting if the commissioner: new text end new text begin (i) has a conflict of interest, as set forth in subdivision 5, or as defined by law. An individual commissioner shall disclose the presence of a conflict of interest or raise a potential conflict of interest when the agenda item is called, prior to the start of discussion or deliberation. Should a conflict of interest become clear during the discussion, the commissioner shall raise the existence of an actual or potential conflict at that time. An individual commissioner may seek the opinion of the general counsel with experience and expertise in the area of election law and voting rights on whether a conflict exists. This opinion shall not be binding on the commission. The Citizens Advisory Redistricting Commission shall decide, by majority vote of commissioners present, whether a conflict of interest exists. A vote may be tabled, if necessary, to obtain the opinion of the general counsel. A commissioner with a conflict of interest is prohibited from participating in any discussion, debate, or decision on that issue; or new text end new text begin (ii) lacks sufficient information about the issue to be decided. If a commissioner abstains for this reason, they shall state for the record their intention to abstain and the reasons for doing so prior to the vote. The abstaining commissioner shall not be restricted or prohibited from participating in any discussion or debate on the issue; and new text end new text begin (2) if any commissioner abstains from voting, a roll call vote shall be required on that issue. The reasons for the abstention shall be entered into the minutes of the meeting at which the vote is taken and be part of the official record. new text end new text begin (b) The right to vote is limited to the commissioners present at the time the vote is taken. Voting by proxy is prohibited. new text end new text begin (c) All votes must be held and determined in public. Secret ballots are prohibited. new text end new text begin (d) Prior to calling for a vote, the chair shall state the question being voted upon. new text end new text begin Subd. 14. new text end new text begin Manner of voting. new text end new text begin Except as otherwise provided in these rules or by law, voting shall be by a two-thirds affirmative vote using voice vote, roll call, or show of hands. Roll call votes shall be taken when required in this section or by law, at the request of any commissioner, or when the chair cannot determine the results of a voice vote. new text end new text begin Subd. 15. new text end new text begin Chair and vice-chair. new text end new text begin (a) The Citizens Advisory Redistricting Commission must elect a chair and vice-chair from among its members by a vote under subdivision 12, paragraph (c). The chair and vice-chair shall not self-identify as belonging to the same political party. new text end new text begin (b) The nomination and election of the chair occurs first and the vice-chair occurs second. new text end new text begin (c) All candidates must be given an equal amount of time to speak in support of their candidacy, to be followed by a period of questions and answers. new text end new text begin (d) The chair shall: new text end new text begin (1) call to order and preside at all meetings; new text end new text begin (2) preserve order and decorum and may speak to points of order in preference to other commissioners; new text end new text begin (3) decide all questions arising under this parliamentary authority in consultation with the general counsel, subject to appeal and reversal by a majority of the commissioners present; new text end new text begin (4) enforce rules of procedure; new text end new text begin (5) perform any other administrative or agenda duties as directed by the advisory commission; new text end new text begin (6) have all the same rights as other commissioners with respect to procedural matters, debate, and voting except that the chair shall not vote on the appeal of a parliamentary ruling by the chair; new text end new text begin (7) approve expenditures associated with the commission for any individual expenditure in excess of $5,000; new text end new text begin (8) when both the chair and vice-chair are absent, designate another of its commissioners to serve as acting chair during such absence or disability; and new text end new text begin (9) establish committees and subcommittees by a majority vote of the commission with the support of at least one vote from a member identifying with the largest political party in the state, one vote from a member identifying with the second largest political party in the state, and one vote from a member identifying with no political party or with a political party that is not the largest or second largest in the state. new text end new text begin (e) The vice-chair shall perform the duties of the chair when the chair is unavailable, except as otherwise provided by law. The vice-chair shall act in the capacity of the chair in the chair's absence. The vice-chair shall help facilitate group discussion on items before the advisory commission. The vice-chair is also responsible for other duties as designated by the chair. new text end new text begin Subd. 16. new text end new text begin Secretary. new text end new text begin The executive director, or their designee, is secretary to the advisory commission without vote and, in that capacity, shall keep the official record of all proceedings of the commission and furnish, under the direction of the commission, all technical services that the commission deems necessary. The duties of the secretary shall also include: new text end new text begin (1) facilitating the process for the selection of commissioners pursuant to subdivision 2, paragraphs (e) to (p), and replacement of commissioners pursuant to subdivision 4, paragraph (h); new text end new text begin (2) issuing a call convening the advisory commission by January 1 in the year of the federal decennial census; new text end new text begin (3) publishing the redistricting plan for each type of district adopted under subdivision 25 within 30 days of the adoption of the plan. This publication shall include the plan and the material reports, reference materials, and data used in drawing it, including any programming information used to produce and test the plan. The published materials shall be such that an independent person is able to replicate the conclusion without any modification of any of the published materials; new text end new text begin (4) maintaining a public record of all proceedings of the advisory commission and publishing and distributing each plan and required documentation. An adopted redistricting plan shall become law upon submission to the secretary of state absent any legal action resulting in a court finding constitutional violations and ordering new maps be drawn; and new text end new text begin (5) taking and maintaining minutes of all advisory commission meetings including votes on all official actions taken at those meetings. All decisions of the commission shall be recorded, and the record of its decisions shall be readily available to any member of the public as required by law and shall be provided without charge. new text end new text begin Subd. 17. new text end new text begin Orientation and training. new text end new text begin (a) Orientation for members of the advisory commission shall be coordinated by the Legislative Coordinating Commission. new text end new text begin (b) Commissioners shall receive nonpartisan orientation, ongoing education, and training on the purposes and activities of the advisory commission. Information may be presented in a manner most convenient or useful to the commission including the use of interactive or subject-matter expert presentations. Training should include insights from other states operating under advisory citizens commissions. new text end new text begin (c) Orientation shall be coordinated by nonpartisan Legislative Coordinating Commission staff and must be completed within four weeks of the commission being formed. new text end new text begin Subd. 18. new text end new text begin Employment of personnel. new text end new text begin The advisory commission shall be compensated as prescribed in law. The Legislative Coordination Commission must provide the commission with the services of nonpartisan experts, consultants, and support staff, as necessary to carry out its duties pursuant to this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 19. new text end new text begin Public hearings in diverse state regions. new text end new text begin (a) Prior to adopting a legislative or congressional districting plan, the advisory commission must hold a minimum of 16 public hearings throughout the state, with at least eight hearings held before adopting preliminary drafts of legislative or congressional district plans. The primary purpose of the first eight public hearings is to request public input on how to define communities of interest and to provide an opportunity for public comment from residents of that part of the state. The commission must make reasonable efforts to schedule hearings in the evenings, on weekends, and at other times that most residents of that region are able to attend. new text end new text begin (b) By February 15 of each year ending in one, the advisory commission must hold at least eight public hearings in diverse regions of the state, including southern Minnesota, central Minnesota, Northern Minnesota, and the Twin Cities Metro Area, before adopting preliminary drafts of legislative or congressional district plans. The primary purpose of these first public hearings in each location is to request advice on how to define communities of interest and to provide an opportunity for public testimony from residents of that community. The commission must make reasonable efforts to schedule hearings in the evenings, on weekends, and at other times that most residents from that region are able to attend. new text end new text begin (c) After completing the first round of public hearings to get public input on communities of interest, the advisory commission must publish on its website preliminary drafts of the legislative and congressional district plans. The commission also must publish the reports for each preliminary draft prior to hearings discussing that draft. The advisory commission must allow the public at least 14 days to submit comments to the commission after publication. After those 14 days, the commission must then hold at least one additional public hearing to allow for open public input and comment. Nonpartisan GIS experts, consultants, and support staff shall be present to hear and consider public comment on the proposed plans. The commission may require its general counsel to attend. new text end new text begin (d) The advisory commission must make reasonable efforts to allow the public to submit written testimony prior to a hearing and make copies of that testimony available to all commissioners and the public prior to and at the hearings. new text end new text begin Subd. 20. new text end new text begin Internal communications. new text end new text begin (a) The advisory commission may designate one or more commission staff to communicate with commissioners regarding administrative matters and may define the scope of the permitted communication. The designation must be announced at the next public hearing following the designation. new text end new text begin (b) A commissioner must not direct, request, suggest, or recommend to staff an interpretation of a districting principle or a change to a district boundary, except during an open meeting of the commission. Communication between retained counsel and members of the commission or the designated commission staff does not violate the provisions of this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 21. new text end new text begin External communications. new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), commissioners and staff must not communicate with anyone outside the commission regarding the content of a plan, except at an open meeting of the commission or when soliciting or receiving written communications regarding a plan that is the subject of a public hearing. new text end new text begin (b) The following external communications are expressly permitted: new text end new text begin (1) a communication of general information about the commission, proceedings of the commission, or redistricting, including questions or requests for information and responses to or from commission staff; new text end new text begin (2) testimony or documents submitted by a person for use at a public hearing; new text end new text begin (3) a report submitted under subdivision 5, clause (11); and new text end new text begin (4) a communication required by chapter 13 or 13D. new text end new text begin Subd. 22. new text end new text begin Prohibitions on gifts and gratuities. new text end new text begin The advisory commission, individual commissioners, staff, attorneys, experts, and consultants may not directly or indirectly solicit or accept any gift or loan of money, goods, services, or other thing of value greater than $5 for the benefit of any person or organization, which may influence the manner in which the individual commissioner, staff, attorney, expert, or consultant performs their duties. new text end new text begin Subd. 23. new text end new text begin Reports of improper activity. new text end new text begin (a) Advisory commission staff shall report to the commission any attempt to exert improper influence over the staff in drafting plans. new text end new text begin (b) A commissioner or commission staff shall report to the advisory commission chair and vice-chair any prohibited communication. The report must include a copy of a written communication or a written summary of an oral communication. new text end new text begin (c) A report under this subdivision must be made no later than three business days after the attempt to exert improper influence or the prohibited communication, or before the next meeting of the commission, whichever is earlier. If special circumstances make this requirement impracticable, the report must be made at the following meeting of the commission. new text end new text begin Subd. 24. new text end new text begin Data used. new text end new text begin (a) The advisory commission shall use census data representing the entire population of this state to draw congressional and legislative districts. Except when required by law or for the purposes of drawing districts in compliance with provisions of state or federal law, citizen voting age or citizen population must not be used as the method to calculate population equality. The commission may also consider demographic trend data provided by the Minnesota state demographer and relevant election data. new text end new text begin (b) The advisory commission shall use population data that reflects incarcerated persons at their last known residence before incarceration. new text end new text begin Subd. 25. new text end new text begin Deadlines. new text end new text begin (a) After completing the public hearings required by subdivision 19, but by May 1 of each year ending in one, the advisory commission shall submit plans and its reports to the legislature for legislative and congressional districts. Each plan must be accompanied by a report summarizing information and testimony received by the redistricting commission in the course of the hearings and include any comments and conclusions the advisory commission deems appropriate on the information and testimony received at the hearings or otherwise presented. To submit a plan to the legislature, the advisory commission must approve the plan by an affirmative vote of twelve members or more, including at least one member identifying with the largest political party in the state, one member identifying with the second largest political party in the state, and one member identifying with no political party or with a political party that is not the largest or second largest in the state. When the advisory commission approves a plan, the plan and its reports must be published to the advisory commission's website. new text end new text begin (b) The legislature intends that a bill be introduced to enact each plan received from the advisory commission and that the bill be brought to a vote within one week in either the senate or the house of representatives under a procedure or rule permitting no amendment. The legislature further intends that the bill be brought to a vote in the second house within one week after final passage in the first house. new text end new text begin (c) If the secretary of the senate or chief clerk of the house of representatives notifies the advisory commission that the first plan has failed, or the governor vetoes the first plan, the commission shall submit a second plan within two weeks after it receives the notice. If the legislature has adjourned the regular session in the year ending in one before the commission submits a second plan, and no special session is called before October 1 to consider the second plan, then the commission must submit the second plan to the legislature before October 1 to be considered at the opening of its regular session in the year ending in two. The legislature intends that the second plan be considered by the legislature under the same procedure provided for a first plan under paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (d) If the secretary of the senate or the chief clerk of the house of representatives notifies the advisory commission that a second plan has failed, or the governor vetoes a second plan, the commission shall submit a third plan within two weeks after it receives the notice. If the legislature has adjourned the regular session in the year ending in one, before the commission submits a third plan, and there is no special session called before October 1 to consider the third plan, then the commission must submit the third plan to the legislature before October 1 to be considered at the opening of its regular session in the year ending in two. The legislature intends that the third plan be considered by the legislature under the same procedure provided for the first and second plans under paragraph (b) whether it is being considered during the regular or a special session with the exception that amendments by the legislature may be proposed. new text end new text begin (e) If the advisory commission cannot reach an agreement on a plan for any reason, the commission shall use the following procedure to adopt a plan for that type of district: new text end new text begin (1) each commissioner may submit one proposed plan for each type of district to the full commission for consideration; new text end new text begin (2) each commissioner shall rank the plans submitted according to preference. Each plan shall be assigned a point value inverse to its ranking among the number of choices, giving the lowest ranked plan one point and the highest ranked plan a point value equal to the number of plans submitted; and new text end new text begin (3) the advisory commission shall adopt the plan receiving the highest total points, that is also ranked among the top half of plans by at least two commissioners not affiliated with the party of the commissioner submitting the plan or, in the case of a plan submitted by nonaffiliated commissioners, is ranked among the top half of plans by at least two commissioners affiliated with a major party. If plans are tied for the highest point total, the executive director shall by lottery select the final plan from those plans. new text end new text begin (f) If the legislature and governor have not approved a plan by October 1 of the year ending in one, then the advisory commission must submit a map approved by the commission to the Minnesota Supreme Court for review for adherence to state constitution and statutes. new text end new text begin (g) If the legislature and governor have neither rejected the commission plans three times, nor approved the commission plans by the statutory required date for plan approval as provided in section 204B.14, and the court has found the commission plan to meet all legal requirements, then the court shall order implementation of the commission plan in the absence of a legislative plan. new text end new text begin (h) Final approval of all plans, whether enacted by the legislature or as provided by court order, must take place no later than the date provided in section 204B.14, subdivision 1a. new text end new text begin (i) Notwithstanding subdivision 30, the established advisory commission must complete its activity by October 1 in each year ending in one. Upon final approval of the advisory commission's adopted plan by the legislature and governor, the plan must be communicated to the secretary of state. The plan becomes effective for the following election upon filing with the secretary of state. The commission must also publish the adopted plans and the related reports on the redistricting commission's website. new text end new text begin Subd. 26. new text end new text begin Activity and evaluation report. new text end new text begin Within 30 days of the enactment into law or adoption by court order of both a legislative plan and a congressional plan, the advisory commission must submit a report to the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, the majority and minority leaders of each house of the legislature, and the governor. At a minimum, the report must include a summary of the commission's work, including the information required in subdivision 5, clause (15), and any recommended changes to laws affecting redistricting. The report must also inform the legislature if the commission determines that funds or other resources provided for the operation of the commission were inadequate. A commissioner who voted against a redistricting plan may submit a dissenting report, which shall be issued with the commission's report. The commission must publish the report on its website. new text end new text begin Subd. 27. new text end new text begin Criminal liability as public officers. new text end new text begin Members of the advisory commission exercise the functions of a public officer for the purposes of sections 609.415 to 609.4751. new text end new text begin Subd. 28. new text end new text begin Data. new text end new text begin The advisory commission is subject to chapter 13, except that a plan is not public data until it has been submitted to the advisory commission for its consideration. new text end new text begin Subd. 29. new text end new text begin Lobbyist registration. new text end new text begin Action by the redistricting commission is administrative action for the purposes of section 10A.01, subdivisions 2 and 21. new text end new text begin Subd. 30. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin (a) The advisory commission expires 45 days after: new text end new text begin (1) both a legislative and a congressional redistricting plan have been enacted into law or adopted by court order; and new text end new text begin (2) any legal challenges to the plans have been resolved. new text end new text begin (b) If a court enjoins the use of a plan after the advisory commission expires, the court enjoining the plan may direct a new commission to be appointed under this section to draft a remedial plan for presentation to the legislature in accordance with deadlines established by the court's order. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [2A.32] REDISTRICTING PRINCIPLES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Districting principles. new text end new text begin The prohibitions and principles in this section apply to both legislative and congressional districts. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibitions new text end new text begin (a) Districts must not be drawn to violate the Fourteenth and Fifteenth Amendments of the United States Constitution or the Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended. new text end new text begin (b) Districts must not be drawn to purposefully favor or disfavor a candidate or incumbent. new text end new text begin (c) Districts must not be drawn using voter registration, voter turnout, voting history, or party preference, including participation in the presidential nominating primary, general election, voting patterns, and primary voting patterns, except for the purposes of verifying the compliance of maps with the requirements of this section and of issuing the reports required by section 2A.31. new text end new text begin (d) Districts must not be drawn using the location of incumbents' or candidates' residences. new text end new text begin (e) Districts must not be drawn using data subject to reporting or regulation under chapter 10A; section 201.091, subdivision 4a; United States Code, title 52, subtitle III; or United States Code, title 26, subtitle H. new text end new text begin (f) Districts must not be drawn with the effect of unduly favoring or disfavoring any political party. Districts shall be subjected to a test of partisan fairness using the standard of proportionality as the benchmark for fairness. Using four recent statewide elections, any proposed Congressional or legislative plan must be close to achieving major-party seat share proportional to the corresponding share of the popular vote in at least three out of the four contests. The standard of closeness is one seat for Congressional contests and seven percentage points for legislative contests. If a plan fails to meet this standard, it triggers a rebuttable presumption of excessive partisan advantage. This may be rebutted if a court determines that the degree of disproportionality was necessary in order to reasonably balance the rules and criteria in effect for redistricting. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Priority of principles. new text end new text begin Districts must be drawn in accordance with the principles in this section. If districts cannot be drawn fully in accordance with the principles, a districting plan must give priority to those principles in the order in which they are listed, except when doing so would violate federal or state law. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Population equality. new text end new text begin (a) Each congressional district must be as nearly equal in population as practicable. new text end new text begin (b) Each legislative district must be substantially equal in population. The population of a legislative district must not deviate by more than plus or minus five percent from the population of the ideal district. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Minority representation. new text end new text begin (a) Districts must not dilute or diminish the equal opportunity of racial, ethnic, and language minorities to participate in the political process and to elect candidates of their choice, whether alone or in coalition with others. new text end new text begin (b) Districts must provide racial minorities and language minorities who constitute less than a voting-age majority of a district with an equal opportunity to substantially influence the outcome of an election. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Preservation of Native Nations. new text end new text begin The reservation lands of a federally recognized Native Nation must be preserved to the extent practicable. Discontiguous portions of a federally recognized Native Nation's reservation lands must be included in the same district and must not be divided more than necessary to meet constitutional requirements. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Communities of interest. new text end new text begin Districts must minimize the division of identifiable communities of interest. A community of interest may include a racial, ethnic, or linguistic group or any group with shared experiences and concerns, including but not limited to geographic, governmental, regional, social, cultural, historic, socioeconomic, occupational, trade, environmental, or transportation interests. Communities of interest shall not include relationships with political parties, incumbents, or candidates. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Convenience and contiguity. new text end new text begin Each district must be convenient and contiguous. A district is convenient if it allows reasonable ease of travel within the district. Contiguity by water is sufficient if the water is not a serious obstacle to travel within the district. A district with areas that touch only at a point is not contiguous. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Nesting. new text end new text begin A representative district must not be divided in the formation of a senate district. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Political subdivisions. new text end new text begin Districts must minimize the division of counties, cities, and towns except when (1) the division occurs because a portion of a city or town is not contiguous with another portion of the same city or town, or (2) despite the division, the known population of any affected county, city, or town remains wholly located within a single district. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Compactness. new text end new text begin Districts must be reasonably compact. More than one measure must be used to evaluate compactness of districts. new text end new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Natural geographic boundaries. new text end new text begin Districts must be drawn to respect natural geographic boundaries to the extent possible, including bodies of water, mountain ranges, and other significant geological and topographic features. new text end new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin Numbering. new text end new text begin (a) Congressional district numbers must begin with district one in the southeast corner of the state and end with the district with the highest number in the northeast corner of the state. new text end new text begin (b) Legislative districts must be numbered in a regular series, beginning with house of representatives district 1A in the northwest corner of the state and proceeding across the state from west to east, north to south. In a county that includes more than one whole senate district, the districts must be numbered consecutively. new text end new text begin Subd. 14. new text end new text begin Additional principles. new text end new text begin The advisory commission established in section 2A.31 may adopt additional principles by a two-thirds vote, but the additional principles must not be prioritized above the principles in the Constitution of Minnesota or in this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 15. new text end new text begin Severability. new text end new text begin The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held to be invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions of this section, which shall be given the maximum possible effect in the absence of the invalid provision. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [2A.33] LEGISLATIVE COORDINATING COMMISSION; REDISTRICTING . new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Administrative and professional support. new text end new text begin The Legislative Coordinating Commission shall provide administrative, professional, and support services to the commission established in section 2A.31. The responsibilities assigned to the Legislative Coordinating Commission executive director may be implemented through a process or delegation to an individual responsible to the executive director to carry out the assigned activities. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Data used. new text end new text begin (a) The geographic areas and population counts used in maps, tables, and legal descriptions of legislative and congressional districts considered by the legislature and the redistricting commission must be those used by the GIS Office. The population counts shall be the block population counts provided to the state under Public Law 94-171 after each decennial census, subject to correction of any errors acknowledged by the United States Census Bureau. new text end new text begin (b) Nothing in this subdivision prohibits the use of additional data, except as provided by sections 2A.31 and 2A.32. new text end new text begin (c) The GIS Office must make this data available to the public on the GIS Office's website. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Publication; consideration of plans. new text end new text begin A plan must not be finalized until the plan's block equivalency file has been submitted to the GIS Office in a form prescribed by the GIS Office. The block equivalency file must show the district to which each census block has been assigned. The GIS Office shall publish each plan submitted to it on the GIS Office's website. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Reports. new text end new text begin Publication of a plan shall include the reports described as follows: new text end new text begin (1) a population equality report that lists each district in the plan, its population as the total number of persons, and deviations from the ideal as both the number of persons and as a percentage of the population. The report must also show the populations of the largest and smallest districts and the overall range of deviations of districts; new text end new text begin (2) a minority voting-age population report that lists for each district the voting age population of each racial, ethnic, or language minority and the total minority voting age population, according to the categories recommended by the United States Department of Justice. The report must also specify each district with 30 percent or more total minority population; new text end new text begin (3) a contiguity report that lists each district that is noncontiguous either because two areas of a district do not touch or because they are linked by a point; new text end new text begin (4) if a plan preserves a community of interest, a communities of interest report that includes maps of the plan with a layer identifying the census blocks within each preserved community of interest and includes a description of the research process used to identify each community of interest. The report must also list each district to which a community of interest has been assigned, the number of communities of interest that are split, and the number of times communities of interest were split; new text end new text begin (5) a political subdivision and Native Nation reservation splits report that lists each split of a county, city, township, federally recognized Native Nation reservation, unorganized territory, and precinct, and the district to which each portion of a split division is assigned. The report also must show the number of subdivisions split and the number of times a subdivision is split; new text end new text begin (6) a plan components report that lists for each district the names and populations of the counties within it and, if a county is split between or among districts, the names and populations of the portion of the split county and each of the split county's whole or partial cities, townships, unorganized territories, and precincts within each district; new text end new text begin (7) a measures of compactness report that lists for each district the results of the multiple measures of compactness, including but not limited to Reock, Polsby-Popper, Minimum Convex Hull, Population Polygon, Population Circle, Ehrenburg, Perimeter, and Length-Width measures. The report must also state for each district the sum of the district's perimeter and the mean of the measurements. The report may list additional tests of compactness that are accepted in political science and statistics literature; and new text end new text begin (8) a partisanship report that lists multiple measures of partisan symmetry. The report may list additional tests of partisan bias that are accepted in political science and statistics literature. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin This article is effective January 1, 2027, if the constitutional amendments proposed in article 1 are not ratified. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-05419 2.91 REDISTRICTING PLANS. Subdivision 1. Distribution. Upon enactment of a redistricting plan for the legislature or for Congress, the Legislative Coordinating Commission shall deposit the plan with the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall provide copies of the relevant portions of the redistricting plan to each county auditor, who shall provide a copy of the relevant portions of the plan to each municipal clerk within the county. The secretary of state, with the cooperation of the commissioner of administration, shall make copies of the plan file, maps, and tables available to the public for the cost of publication. The revisor of statutes shall code a metes and bounds description of the districts in Minnesota Statutes. Subd. 2. Corrections. The legislature intends that a redistricting plan encompass all the territory of this state, that no territory be omitted or duplicated, that all districts consist of convenient contiguous territory substantially equal in population, and that political subdivisions not be divided more than necessary to meet constitutional requirements. Therefore, in implementing a redistricting plan for the legislature or for Congress, the secretary of state, after notifying the Legislative Coordinating Commission and the revisor of statutes, shall order the following corrections: (a) If a territory in this state is not named in the redistricting plan but lies within the boundaries of a district, it is a part of the district within which it lies. (b) If a territory in this state is not named in the redistricting plan but lies between the boundaries of two or more districts, it is a part of the contiguous district having the smallest population. (c) If a territory in this state is assigned in the redistricting plan to two or more districts, it is part of the district having the smallest population. (d) If a territory in this state is assigned to a district that consists of other territory containing a majority of the population of the district but with which it is not contiguous, the territory is a part of the contiguous district having the smallest population. (e) If the description of a district boundary line that divides a political subdivision is ambiguous because a highway, street, railroad track, power transmission line, river, creek, or other physical feature or census block boundary that forms part of the district boundary is omitted or is not properly named or has been changed, or because a compass direction for the boundary line is wrong, the secretary of state shall add or correct the name or compass direction and resolve the ambiguity in favor of creating districts of convenient, contiguous territory of substantially equal population that do not divide political subdivisions more than is necessary to meet constitutional requirements. Subd. 3. Notice of corrections. The secretary of state shall provide a copy of each correction order to each affected county auditor, municipal clerk, and candidate. Subd. 4. Recommendations to legislature. The secretary of state and the revisor of statutes shall recommend to the legislature any additional technical corrections to the redistricting plan they deem necessary or desirable.